Illinois, session 104th, HB5454.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title.This Act may be cited as the 5Consumer Protection New Construction Residential Housing Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Builder" means any person, corporation, partnership, or 8other entity contracting with an owner for the construction or 9sale of a new home.10    "Building code" means a building code adopted by the State 11or a unit of local government.12    "Constructed in a skillful manner" means that workmanship 13and materials meet or exceed the specific standards of the 14applicable building code. For the purposes of this definition, 15if the applicable building code does not provide relevant 16specific standard, "constructed in a skillful manner" means 17that workmanship and materials meet or exceed the standards of 18locally accepted building practices.19    "Material defect" means actual physical damage to the 20following load-bearing portions of the home caused by failure 21of the load-bearing portions which affects their load-bearing 22functions to the extent that the home becomes unsafe, 23unsanitary, or otherwise unlivable: foundation systems and   HB5454- 2 -LRB104 19699 JRC 33148 b1footings; beams; girders; lintels; columns; walls and 2partitions; floor systems; and roof framing systems.3    "New home" or "home" means any single family house or 4for-sale unit in a multi-unit residential structure of 5 5stories or less in which title to the individual units is 6transferred to owners under a condominium or cooperative 7regime. "New home" or "home" does not include dwellings 8constructed solely for lease, mobile home, or any house or 9unit in which the builder has resided or leased continuously 10for 3 years or more following the date of completion of 11construction, as evidenced by a certificate of occupancy.12    "Owner" means the first person to whom the home is sold 13and, during the unexpired portion of the warranty period, each 14successor in title to the home and any mortgagee in 15possession. "Owner" does not include the builder of the home 16or any firm under common control of the builder.17    "Plumbing, electrical, heating, cooling, and ventilation 18systems" mean:19        (1) in the case of plumbing systems: gas supply lines 20    and fittings; water supply, waste, and vent pipes and 21    their fittings; septic tanks and their drain fields; 22    water, gas, and sewer service piping, and their extensions 23    to the tie-in of a public utility connection, or on-site 24    well and sewage disposal system;25        (2) in the case of electrical systems: all wiring, 26    electrical boxes, switches, outlets and connections up to   HB5454- 3 -LRB104 19699 JRC 33148 b1    the public utility connection; and2        (3) in the case of heating, cooling, and ventilation 3    systems: all duct work, steam, water, and refrigerant 4    lines, registers, convectors, radiation elements, and 5    dampers.6    "Warranty date" means the date of the passing of title to 7the first owner for occupancy by the owner or the owner's 8family as a residence, or the date of first occupancy of the 9home as a residence, whichever occurs first. 10    Section 10. Housing merchant implied warranty. 11    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a housing 12merchant implied warranty is implied in the contract or 13agreement for the sale of a new home and shall survive the 14passing of title. A housing merchant implied warranty shall 15mean that:16        (1) one year from and after the warranty date the home 17    will be free from defects due to a failure to have been 18    constructed in a skillful manner;19        (2) 2 years from and after the warranty date the 20    plumbing, electrical, heating, cooling, and ventilation 21    systems of the home will be free from defects due to a 22    failure by the builder to have installed the systems in a 23    skillful manner; and24        (3) six years from and after the warranty date the 25    home will be free from material defects.  HB5454- 4 -LRB104 19699 JRC 33148 b1    (b) Unless the contract or agreement by its terms clearly 2evidences a different intention of the seller, a housing 3merchant implied warranty does not extend to:4        (1) any defect that does not constitute (i) defective 5    workmanship by the builder or by an agent, employee or 6    subcontractor of the builder, (ii) defective materials 7    supplied by the builder or by an agent, employee or 8    subcontractor of the builder, or (iii) defective design 9    provided by a design professional retained exclusively by 10    the builder; or11        (2) any patent defect which an examination ought in 12    the circumstances to have revealed, when the buyer before 13    taking title or accepting construction as complete has 14    examined the home as fully as the buyer desired, or has 15    refused to examine the home.16    (c) In the case of goods sold incidentally with or 17included in the sale of the new home, such as stoves, 18refrigerators, freezers, room air conditioners, dishwashers, 19clothes washers, and dryers, a housing merchant implied 20warranty shall mean that the goods shall be free from defects 21due to failure by the builder or any agent, employee, or 22subcontractor of the builder to have installed the systems in 23a skillful manner. Merchantability, fitness, and all other 24implied warranties with respect to goods shall be governed by 25the Uniform Commercial Code and any other applicable statute.26    (d)(1) A written notice of a warranty claim for breach of a   HB5454- 5 -LRB104 19699 JRC 33148 b1housing merchant implied warranty must be received by the 2builder prior to the commencement of any action under 3paragraph (2) and no later than 30 days after the expiration of 4the applicable warranty period, as described in subsection 5(a). The owner and occupant of the home shall afford the 6builder reasonable opportunity to inspect, test, and repair 7the portion of the home to which the warranty claim relates.8    (2) An action for damages or other relief caused by the 9breach of a housing merchant implied warranty may be commenced 10prior to the expiration of one year after the applicable 11warranty period, as described in subsection (a), or within 4 12years after the warranty date, whichever is later. If the 13builder makes repairs in response to a warranty claim under 14paragraph (1), an action with respect to the claim may be 15commenced within one year after the last date on which the 16repairs are performed. The measure of damages shall be the 17reasonable cost of repair or replacement and property damage 18to the home proximately caused by the breach of warranty, not 19to exceed the replacement cost of the home exclusive of the 20value of the land, unless the court finds that, under the 21circumstances, the diminution in value of the home caused by 22the defect is a more equitable measure of damages.23    (3) In addition to any other period for the commencement 24of an action permitted by law, an action for contribution or 25indemnification may be commenced at any time prior to the 26expiration of one year after the entry of judgment in an action   HB5454- 6 -LRB104 19699 JRC 33148 b1for damages under paragraph (2).2    (e) Except as otherwise provided in Section 15, any 3provision of a contract or agreement for the sale of a new home 4which excludes or modifies a housing merchant implied warranty 5shall be void as contrary to public policy.6    (f) Except as otherwise provided in Section 15, other 7implied warranties may arise from the terms of the contract or 8agreement or from course of dealing or usage of trade. 9    Section 15. Exclusion or modification of warranties. 10    (a) Except in the case of a housing merchant implied 11warranty, the builder or seller of a new home may exclude or 12modify all warranties by any clear and conspicuous terms 13contained in the written contract or agreement of sale which 14call the buyer's attention to the exclusion or modification of 15warranties and make the exclusion or modification plain.16    (b) Except in the case of a housing merchant implied 17warranty, the builder or seller of a new home may exclude or 18modify warranties with respect to particular defects by any 19clear and conspicuous terms contained in the written contract 20or agreement of sale which identify the defects, call the 21buyer's attention to the exclusion or modification of 22warranties and make the exclusion or modification plain.23    (c) A housing merchant implied warranty may be excluded or 24modified by the builder or seller of a new home only if the 25buyer is offered a limited warranty in accordance with the   HB5454- 7 -LRB104 19699 JRC 33148 b1provisions of this Section.2    A copy of the express terms of the limited warranty shall 3be provided in writing to the buyer for examination prior to 4the time of the buyer's execution of the contract or agreement 5to purchase the home. A copy of the express terms of the 6limited warranty shall be included in, or annexed to, and 7incorporated in, the contract or agreement.8    The language of the contract or agreement for sale of the 9home must conspicuously mention the housing merchant implied 10warranty and provide that the limited warranty excludes or 11modifies the implied warranty. Language to exclude all implied 12warranties is sufficient if it states, for example, that 13"There are no warranties which extend beyond those included in 14the contract or agreement".15    The limited warranty shall meet or exceed the standards 16provided in subsections (d) and (e).17    (d) A limited warranty sufficient to exclude or modify a 18housing merchant implied warranty must be written in plain 19English and must clearly disclose:20        (1) that the warranty is a limited warranty which 21    limits implied warranties on the sale of the home; the 22    words "limited warranty" must be clearly and conspicuously 23    captioned at the beginning of the warranty document;24        (2) the identification of the names and addresses of 25    all warrantors;26        (3) the identification of the party or parties to whom   HB5454- 8 -LRB104 19699 JRC 33148 b1    the warranty is extended and whether it is extended to 2    subsequent owners; the limited warranty must be extended 3    to the first owner of the home and survive the passing of 4    title but may exclude any or all subsequent owners;5        (4) a statement of the products or parts covered by 6    the limited warranty;7        (5) the clear and conspicuous identification of any 8    parts or portions of the home or premises that are 9    excepted or excluded from warranty coverage, and the 10    standards that will be used to determine whether a defect 11    has occurred; provided, however, that:12            (A) any exception, exclusion, or standard which 13        does not meet or exceed a relevant specific standard 14        of the applicable building code, or in the absence of 15        the relevant specific standard a locally accepted 16        building practice, shall be void as contrary to public 17        policy and shall be deemed to establish the applicable 18        building code standard or locally accepted building 19        practice as the warranty standard; and20            (B) any exception, exclusion, or standard that 21        fails to ensure that the home is habitable, by 22        permitting conditions to exist which render the home 23        unsafe, shall be void as contrary to public policy;24        (6) what the builder and any other warrantor will do 25    when a defect covered by the warranty does arise, and the 26    time within which the builder and any other warrantor will   HB5454- 9 -LRB104 19699 JRC 33148 b1    act;2        (7) the term of the warranty coverage and when the 3    term begins, provided, however, that the term shall be 4    equal to or exceed the warranty periods of a housing 5    merchant implied warranty, as defined in subsection (a) of 6    Section 10;7        (8) step-by-step claims procedures required to be 8    undertaken by the owner, if any, including directions for 9    notification of the builder and any other warrantor; an 10    owner shall not be required to submit to binding 11    arbitration or to pay any fee or charge for participation 12    in nonbinding arbitration or any mediation process; and13        (9) any limitations on or exclusions of consequential 14    or incidental damages, and any limitations on the 15    builder's and other warrantor's total liability, 16    conspicuously expressed on the first page of the warranty.17    Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, a 18limited warranty shall not be construed to permit any 19limitation on or exclusion of property damage to the home 20proximately caused by a breach of the limited warranty, where 21the court finds that the limitation or exclusion would cause 22the limited warranty to fail of its essential purpose, except 23that the property damage may be limited by an express 24limitation on the builder's or other warrantor's total 25liability in accordance with the provisions of this paragraph.   HB5454- 10 -LRB104 19699 JRC 33148 b1    Section 20. Home rule. The regulation of implied 2warranties for new homes is an exclusive power and function of 3the State. A home rule unit may not regulate implied 4warranties for new homes. This Section is a denial and 5limitation of home rule powers and functions under subsection 6(h) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 7    Section 25. Relation to other laws. Nothing in this Act 8shall be construed to repeal, invalidate, supersede, or 9restrict any right, liability, or remedy provided by any other 10statute, except where the construction would, as a matter of 11law, be unreasonable.